Utah statutes.
53B-2a-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board of trustees" means the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees.

(2)  "College campus" means a college campus of the Utah College of Applied Technology.

(3)  "Competency-based" means mastery of subject matter or skill level, as demonstrated through business and industry approved standards and assessments, achieved through participation in a hands-on learning environment, and which is tied to observable, measurable performance objectives.

(4)  "Open-entry, open-exit" means:

(a)  a method of instructional delivery that allows for flexible scheduling in response to individual student needs or requirements and demonstrated competency when knowledge and skills have been mastered;

(b)  students have the flexibility to begin or end study at any time, progress through course material at their own pace, and demonstrate competency when knowledge and skills have been mastered; and

(c)  if competency is demonstrated in a program of study, a credential, certificate, or diploma may be awarded.



Amended by Chapter 346, 2009 General Session

